lt-LT_morphology.aff
FLAG num
SFX 1326 Y 4
SFX 1326 asis amsi . 83
SFX 1326 asis usis . 85
SFX 1326 asis aisi . 86
SFX 1326 asis uosise . 87

SFX 1330 Y 51
SFX 1330 as as . 75
SFX 1330 as o . 76
SFX 1330 as am . 79
SFX 1330 as ą . 80
SFX 1330 as u . 81
SFX 1330 as ame . 82
SFX 1330 as am . 113
SFX 1330 as as . 89
SFX 1330 as i . 77
SFX 1330 as ų . 78
SFX 1330 as iems . 83
SFX 1330 as iem . 84
SFX 1330 as us . 85
SFX 1330 as ais . 86
SFX 1330 as uose . 87
SFX 1330 as uos . 88
SFX 1330 as i . 93
SFX 1330 as a . 121
SFX 1330 as os . 122
SFX 1330 as ai . 125
SFX 1330 as ą . 126
SFX 1330 as a . 127
SFX 1330 as oje . 128
SFX 1330 as oj . 129
SFX 1330 as a . 136
SFX 1330 as os . 123
SFX 1330 as ų . 124
SFX 1330 as oms . 130
SFX 1330 as om . 131
SFX 1330 as as . 132
SFX 1330 as omis . 133
SFX 1330 as om . 134
SFX 1330 as ose . 135
SFX 1330 as os . 137
SFX 1330 a a . 121
SFX 1330 a os . 122
SFX 1330 a ai . 125
SFX 1330 a ą . 126
SFX 1330 a a . 127
SFX 1330 a oje . 128
SFX 1330 a oj . 129
SFX 1330 a a . 136
SFX 1330 a os . 123
SFX 1330 a ų . 124
SFX 1330 a oms . 130
SFX 1330 a om . 131
SFX 1330 a as . 132
SFX 1330 a omis . 133
SFX 1330 a om . 134
SFX 1330 a ose . 135
SFX 1330 a os . 137

SFX 1338 Y 6
SFX 1338 as an . 90
SFX 1338 as uosna . 91
SFX 1338 as on . 139
SFX 1338 as osna . 140
SFX 1338 a on . 139
SFX 1338 a osna . 140

SFX 1339 Y 3
SFX 1339 as u . 92
SFX 1339 as i . 141
SFX 1339 a i . 141

SFX 1390 Y 7
SFX 1390 as a . 151
SFX 1390 as iau [^dt]as 152
SFX 1390 as žiau das 152
SFX 1390 tas čiau tas 152
SFX 1390 as iausia [^dt]as 153
SFX 1390 as žiausia das 153
SFX 1390 tas čiausia tas 153

SFX 1394 Y 1
SFX 1394 as ėliau . 154

SFX 1398 Y 2
SFX 1398 as asis/452 . 155
SFX 1398 a oji/452 . 155

SFX 1399 Y 2
SFX 1399 as asis/453 . 155
SFX 1399 a oji/453 . 155

SFX 1400 Y 2
SFX 1400 as asis/454 . 155
SFX 1400 a oji/454 . 155

SFX 1404 Y 1
SFX 1404 as esnis/455 . 156

SFX 1405 Y 1
SFX 1405 as esnis/456 . 156

SFX 1406 Y 1
SFX 1406 as esnis/457 . 156

SFX 1407 Y 4
SFX 1407 as esnysis/452 . 157
SFX 1407 as iausiasis/452 [^dt]as 158
SFX 1407 as žiausiasis/452 das 158
SFX 1407 tas čiausiasis/452 tas 158

SFX 1408 Y 4
SFX 1408 as esnysis/453 . 157
SFX 1408 as iausiasis/453 [^dt]as 158
SFX 1408 as žiausiasis/453 das 158
SFX 1408 tas čiausiasis/453 tas 158

SFX 1409 Y 4
SFX 1409 as esnysis/454 . 157
SFX 1409 as iausiasis/454 [^dt]as 158
SFX 1409 as žiausiasis/454 das 158
SFX 1409 tas čiausiasis/454 tas 158

SFX 1410 Y 1
SFX 1410 as ėlesnis/455 . 159

SFX 1411 Y 1
SFX 1411 as ėlesnis/456 . 159

SFX 1412 Y 1
SFX 1412 as ėlesnis/457 . 159

SFX 1413 Y 1
SFX 1413 as ėlesnysis/452 . 160

SFX 1414 Y 1
SFX 1414 as ėlesnysis/453 . 160

SFX 1415 Y 1
SFX 1415 as ėlesnysis/454 . 160

SFX 1416 Y 3
SFX 1416 as iausias/458 [^dt]as 161
SFX 1416 as žiausias/458 das 161
SFX 1416 tas čiausias/458 tas 161

SFX 1417 Y 3
SFX 1417 as iausias/459 [^dt]as 161
SFX 1417 as žiausias/459 das 161
SFX 1417 tas čiausias/459 tas 161

SFX 1418 Y 3
SFX 1418 as iausias/460 [^dt]as 161
SFX 1418 as žiausias/460 das 161
SFX 1418 tas čiausias/460 tas 161

SFX 1434 Y 34
SFX 1434 ukas ukas . 75
SFX 1434 ukas uko . 76
SFX 1434 ukas ukui . 79
SFX 1434 ukas uką . 80
SFX 1434 ukas uku . 81
SFX 1434 ukas ukame . 82
SFX 1434 ukas ukam . 113
SFX 1434 ukas uk . 89
SFX 1434 ukas ukai . 77
SFX 1434 ukas ukų . 78
SFX 1434 ukas ukams . 83
SFX 1434 ukas ukam . 84
SFX 1434 ukas ukus . 85
SFX 1434 ukas ukais . 86
SFX 1434 ukas ukuose . 87
SFX 1434 ukas ukuos . 88
SFX 1434 ukas ukai . 93
SFX 1434 ukas ukė . 121
SFX 1434 ukas ukės . 122
SFX 1434 ukas ukei . 125
SFX 1434 ukas ukę . 126
SFX 1434 ukas uke . 127
SFX 1434 ukas ukėje . 128
SFX 1434 ukas ukėj . 129
SFX 1434 ukas uke . 136
SFX 1434 ukas ukės . 123
SFX 1434 ukas ukių . 124
SFX 1434 ukas ukėms . 130
SFX 1434 ukas ukėm . 131
SFX 1434 ukas ukes . 132
SFX 1434 ukas ukėmis . 133
SFX 1434 ukas ukėm . 134
SFX 1434 ukas ukėse . 135
SFX 1434 ukas ukės . 137

SFX 1442 Y 4
SFX 1442 ukas ukan . 90
SFX 1442 ukas ukuosna . 91
SFX 1442 ukas ukėn . 139
SFX 1442 ukas ukėsna . 140

SFX 1443 Y 2
SFX 1443 ukas uku . 92
SFX 1443 ukas uki . 141

AF 1330,1390,1394,1398,1404,1407,1410,1413,1416,65521 # 16
AF 1330,1390,1398,65521 # 32
AF 1315,1317,1321,1322,1324,1326,65521 # 63
AF 1330,1390,1394,1398,65521 # 78
AF 1330,1338,1390,1394,1398,1399,1404,1405,1407,1408,1410,1411,1413,1414,1416,1417,65521 # 83
AF 1434,65521 # 85
AF 1330,1390,1398,1404,1407,1416,65521 # 109
AF 1434,1442,65521 # 378
