lt-LT_morphology.dic
aklutukas/85	8
anarchiškas/16	8
anglingas/16	8
angliškas/16	8
ankstyvas/83	8
apologetiškas/16	8
argumentuotas/16	8
aristokratiškas/16	8
armėniškas/16	8
atitinkamas/83	8
audrotas/16	8
aukštas/83	8
automatizavimasis/63	16
autonomiškas/16	8
autoritariškas/16	8
avangardiškas/16	8
balotiravimasis/63	16
baugokas/32	8
beteisiškas/16	8
beviltiškas/83	8
beždžioniškas/16	8
biochemiškas/16	8
blaivymasis/63	16
brazdinimasis/63	16
čekiškas/16	8
čerpiškas/16	8
dabitiškas/16	8
dailinimasis/63	16
darganas/16	8
daužymasis/63	16
dažnas/83	8
dergimasis/63	16
dichotomiškas/16	8
didingas/16	8
dieviškas/16	8
drabstymasis/63	16
drėgnas/83	8
duobėtas/16	8
dūrimasis/63	16
dvejopas/16	8
ekologiškas/83	8
entuziastingas/16	8
entuziastiškas/16	8
ergonomiškas/16	8
fermentavimasis/63	16
fragmentuotas/16	8
frankofoniškas/16	8
frigidiškas/16	8
galvijiškas/16	8
garinimasis/63	16
geras/83	8
gipsingas/16	8
gyrimasis/63	16
gyslotas/16	8
glazūruotas/16	8
graudenimasis/63	16
greitas/83	8
grynas/83	8
grublėtas/16	8
grupavimasis/63	16
gūsingas/16	8
hamletiškas/16	8
heterofiliškas/16	8
ilgas/83	8
impozantiškas/16	8
impresionistiškas/16	8
įnirtingas/16	8
įprastas/83	8
islandiškas/16	8
įspūdingas/83	8
išvengiamas/16	8
įtaigingas/16	8
jaučiamas/16	8
kabarojimasis/63	16
kampuotas/16	8
kanadietiškas/16	8
kankinimasis/63	16
karingas/16	8
karpiškas/16	8
karštas/83	8
katalikiškas/83	8
keturgubas/16	8
keturlinkas/16	8
kilnojimasis/63	16
kiniškas/16	8
klaidingas/83	8
konsekventiškas/16	8
konservuotas/16	8
konstituciškas/16	8
korimasis/63	16
kosmiškas/16	8
krikščioniškas/83	8
kuoduotas/16	8
kupinas/83	8
kūrenimasis/63	16
labirintiškas/16	8
laikinas/83	8
laimingas/83	8
lemiamas/83	8
lemtingas/83	8
lengvas/83	8
liaunas/16	8
liepsningas/16	8
lietuviškas/83	8
linksmas/83	8
linksminimasis/63	16
liuksemburgietiškas/16	8
matomas/16	8
mauriškas/16	8
mažiukas/85	8
mažučiukas/85	8
mažuliukas/85	8
mėlynas/83	8
melodingas/16	8
menkas/83	8
mentoriškas/16	8
migdymasis/63	16
milžiniškas/83	8
minkštakūniškas/16	8
minkštas/83	8
mongoliškas/16	8
neankštas/16	8
neapibrėžtas/83	8
neasocijuotas/16	8
nebemieguistas/32	8
nebepavojingas/16	8
nebeprasmiškas/16	8
neciniškas/16	8
nedažnas/16	8
nedidukas/378	8
negalimas/83	8
negeras/83	8
negyvenamas/83	8
neidentiškas/16	8
neigiamas/83	8
neįkainojamas/16	8
neišsemiamas/16	8
nekaimietiškas/32	8
neliečiamas/16	8
nelygstamas/16	8
nemadingas/16	8
nemažas/83	8
nemažiukas/85	8
nemokytas/16	8
nepakaltinamas/16	8
nepasiekiamas/83	8
neporėtas/16	8
nepremijuotas/16	8
nepriklausomas/83	8
neraguotas/16	8
nerūpestingas/83	8
neskaitlingas/32	8
nesulaikomas/16	8
nesveikas/83	8
nešališkas/16	8
netiesiškas/16	8
netikėtas/83	8
netikras/16	8
netolimas/83	8
nežmogiškas/16	8
nostalgiškas/16	8
nuostolingas/16	8
padaužiškas/16	8
pagiriojimasis/63	16
pailgas/83	8
palaimintas/83	8
paršingas/16	8
patologiškas/16	8
pavėsingas/16	8
pavojingas/83	8
perregimas/16	8
piktas/83	8
pilnas/83	8
plaukuotas/16	8
plėšymasis/63	16
plonas/83	8
prakeiktas/83	8
pranciškoniškas/16	8
pražūtingas/83	8
presuotas/16	8
prieinamas/83	8
prieštaringas/83	8
problematiškas/16	8
psichologiškas/16	8
pumpuravimasis/63	16
rediskontuotas/16	8
reikiamas/83	8
reklamavimasis/63	16
religingas/16	8
rimtas/83	8
ritmingas/16	8
rūpestingas/16	8
samdymasis/63	16
sausas/83	8
savitas/83	8
sėkmingas/16	8
senučiukas/85	8
septyngubas/16	8
singapūrietiškas/32	8
sinkretiškas/16	8
skeryčiojimasis/63	16
slaptas/83	8
smerkimasis/63	16
spektrofotometriškas/16	8
srovingas/16	8
stanislavskiškas/78	8
stebeilijimasis/63	16
studentiškas/16	8
sutartas/83	8
šaipymasis/63	16
širmas/83	8
šyvas/16	8
šleivas/16	8
švaistūniškas/16	8
taisymasis/63	16
tariamas/83	8
taviškas/16	8
tęsimasis/63	16
tolimas/83	8
tragiškas/83	8
turkiškas/16	8
tuštinimasis/63	16
universitetiškas/16	8
uolingas/83	8
vaizdingas/16	8
vėdinimasis/63	16
veiksmingas/83	8
vėjavaikiškas/16	8
vienašališkas/16	8
vienišas/83	8
vilkinga/16	8
vyriškas/83	8
žalas/16	8
žavėjimasis/63	16
žinybiškas/16	8
pochuistiškas/109	42
nezgrabnas/16	61
pravoslaviškas/16	61
